New Jersey, session 222, A3905.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Commissioner of Community Affairs, in consultation with the Board of Public Utilities, shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), a set of standards to allow for the safe indoor storage of batteries that are part of an energy storage system for a building or facility.  The types of batteries for which the standards are to be developed pursuant to this section shall include, but shall not be limited to the following battery types: (1)  lithium-ion; (2)  nickel-cadmium; (3)  nickel metal hydride; (4)  flow or redox flow; and (5)  lead acid. b.  The standards required to be promulgated pursuant to this section shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1)  developing specific indoor storage safety requirements for the batteries; (2)  communicating with the fire official or code enforcement official of a municipality where the batteries are going to be stored; and (3)  developing safe procedures, in consultation with the New Jersey Department of Environmental Protection, for the disposal of batteries. 2.  After the battery safety storage standards have been adopted, the Commissioner shall incorporate those standards into the State Uniform Construction Code Act, P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.). 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.